Utah statutes.
9-4-504.   Powers, functions, and duties of board of review.

The board of review shall:

(1)  make, subject to the limitations of the code, allocations of volume cap to issuing authorities;

(2)  determine the amount of volume cap to be allocated with respect to approved applications;

(3)  maintain a record of all applications filed by issuing authorities under Section 9-4-505 and all certificates of allocation issued under Section 9-4-507;

(4)  maintain a record of all bonds issued by issuing authorities during each year;

(5)  determine the amount of volume cap to be treated as a carryforward under Section 146(f) of the code and allocate this carryforward to one or more qualified carryforward purposes;

(6)  make available upon reasonable request a certified copy of all or any part of the records maintained by the board of review under this part or a summary of them including information relating to the volume cap for each year and any amounts available for allocation under this part;

(7)  promulgate rules for the allocation of volume cap under this part; and

(8)  charge reasonable fees for the performance of duties prescribed by this part, including application, filing, and processing fees.

